th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ของเล่นดนตรี: ชุดสตูดิโอดีเจ; กลองและเครื่องเคาะ; แผ่นดนตรีแบบโต้ตอบ; ชุดคาราโอเกะ; ไมโครโฟน; หนังสือดนตรี; กล่องดนตรีต่างๆ; เปียโนและคีย์บอร์ด; เครื่องสาย; เครื่องดนตรีเป่าลม; ไซโลโฟน
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Zenejátékok: DJ stúdió készletek; Dobok és ütőhangszerek; Interaktív zeneszőnyegek; Karaokeszettek; Mikrofonok; Zenés könyvek; Zenés dobozok; Zongora és billentyűs hangszerek; Vonós hangszerek; Fúvós hangszerek; Xilofonok
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Музикални играчки: DJ студийни комплекти; Барабани и ударни инструменти; Интерактивни музикални постелки; Комплекти за караоке; Микрофони; Музикални книги; Музикални кутии; Пиана и клавишни инструменти; Струнни инструменти; Духови инструменти; Ксилофони
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Hudební hračky: Studiové DJ sety; Bicí a perkusní nástroje; Interaktivní hudební podložky; Sady pro karaoke; Mikrofony; Hudební knížky; Hudební boxy; Klavíry a klávesové nástroje; Strunné nástroje; Dechové nástroje; Xylofony
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Jouets musicaux: Ensembles de studio DJ; Batteries et instruments à percussion; Tapis musicaux interactifs; Ensembles de karaoké; Microphones; Livres musicaux; Boîtes à musiques; Pianos et claviers; Instruments à cordes; Instruments à vents; Xylophones
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Музыкальные игрушки: Диджейские наборы; Барабаны и ударные инструменты; Интерактивные музыкальные коврики; Наборы для караоке; Микрофоны; Музыкальные книги; Музыкальные шкатулки; Пианино и клавишные инструменты; Струнные инструменты; Духовые инструменты; Ксилофоны
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Hudobné hračky: DJ štúdio súpravy; Bicie a perkusné nástroje; Interaktívne hudobné podložky; Karaoke súpravy; Mikrofóny; Hudobné knihy; Hudobné skrinky; Klavíry a klávesy; Sláčikové nástroje; Dychové nástroje; Xylofóny
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Muzikiniai žaislai: DJ studijos rinkiniai; Būgnai ir mušamieji instrumentai; Interaktyvūs muzikiniai kilimėliai; Karaokės rinkiniai; Mikrofonai; Muzikinės knygos; Muzikinės dėžutės; Fortepijonai ir klaviatūros; Styginiai instrumentai; Pučiamieji instrumentai; Ksilofonai
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Muziekspeelgoed: Dj-studiosets; Drums en percussie-instrumenten; Interactieve muziekmatten; Karaokesets; Microfoons; Muziekboeken; Muziekspeeldozen; Piano's en toetsenborden; Snaarinstrumenten; Windinstrumenten; Xylofoons
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Musikleksaker: DJ-studioset; Trummor och slagverksinstrument; Interaktiva musikaliska mattor; Karaokeset; Mikrofoner; Musikaliska böcker; Musikaliska lådor; Pianon och keyboards; Stränginstrument; Blåsinstrument; Xylofoner
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos musicais: Conjuntos de estúdio de DJ; Baterias e instrumentos de percussão; Tapetes musicais interativos; Conjuntos de karaoke; Microfones; Livros musicais; Caixas musicais; Pianos e teclados; Instrumentos de corda; Instrumentos de sopro; Xilofones
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Zabawki muzyczne: Zestawy DJ Studio; Perkusja i instrumenty perkusyjne; Interaktywne maty muzyczne; Zestawy karaoke; Mikrofony; Książki z pozytywką; Pozytywki zabawkowe; Pianina i keyboardy; Instrumenty strunowe; Instrumenty dęte; Ksylofony
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 音樂玩具: DJ 工作室玩具組; 鼓/打擊樂器; 互動音樂墊; 卡拉 OK 玩具組; 麥克風; 音樂書籍; 玩具音樂盒; 鋼琴/鍵盤; 弦樂; 管弦樂器; 木琴
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos musicais: Conjuntos de estúdio de DJ; Bateria e instrumentos de percussão; Tapetes musicais interativos; Conjuntos de karaokê; Microfones; Livros musicais; Caixas musicais; Pianos e teclados; Instrumentos de corda; Instrumentos de sopro; Xilofones
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Müzikli Oyuncaklar: DJ Stüdyo Setleri; Davullar ve Vurmalı Çalgılar; İnteraktif Müzik Matları; Karaoke Setleri; Mikrofonlar; Müzik Kitapları; Müzik Kutuları; Piyanolar ve Klavyeler; Telli Çalgılar; Üflemeli Çalgılar; Ksilofonlar
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Juguetes musicales: Sets de estudio para DJ; Baterías e instrumentos de percusión; Tapetes musicales interactivos; Juegos de karaoke; Micrófonos; Libros musicales; Cajas musicales; Pianos y teclados; Instrumentos de cuerda; Instrumentos de viento; Xilófonos
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Musiikkilelut: DJ-studiosetit; Rummut ja lyömäsoittimet; Interaktiiviset musiikkimatot; Karaokesarjat; Mikrofonit; Musiikkikirjat; Soittorasiat; Pianot ja koskettimet; Jousisoittimet; Puhallinsoittimet; Ksylofonit
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Giocattoli musicali: Set da studio per DJ; Batteria e strumenti a percussione; Tappetini musicali interattivi; Set karaoke; Microfoni; Libri musicali; Scatole musicali; Pianoforti e tastiere; Strumenti a corda; Strumenti a fiato; Xilofoni
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Μουσικά παιχνίδια: Σετ στούντιο DJ; Τύμπανα & κρουστά όργανα; Διαδραστικά μουσικά χαλάκια; Σετ καραόκε; Μικρόφωνα; Μουσικά βιβλία; Μουσικά κουτιά; Πιάνα & αρμόνια; Έγχορδα όργανα; Πνευστά όργανα; Ξυλόφωνα
en: Toys & Games > Toys > Musical Toys: DJ Studio Sets; Drums & Percussion Instruments; Interactive Musical Mats; Karaoke Sets; Microphones; Musical Books; Musical Boxes; Pianos & Keyboards; String Instruments; Wind Instruments; Xylophones
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 음악 장난감: DJ 스튜디오 세트; 드럼/타악기; 인터랙티브 뮤직 매트; 노래방 세트; 마이크; 뮤직북; 오르골; 피아노/키보드; 현악기; 관악기; 실로폰
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 音乐玩具: DJ 工作室套装; 鼓和打击乐器; 互动音乐垫; 卡拉 OK 套装; 麦克风; 音乐书; 音乐盒; 钢琴/电子琴; 弦乐器; 管乐器; 木琴
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Musikspielzeuge: DJ-Studio-Sets; Trommeln und Schlaginstrumente; Interaktive Musikmatten; Karaoke-Sets; Mikrofone; Musikbücher; Spieluhren; Klaviere und Keyboards; Saiteninstrumente; Blasinstrumente; Xylophone
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Musiklegetøj: DJ-sæt; Trommer og percussioninstrumenter; Interaktive musikalske måtter; Karaokesæt; Mikrofoner; Musikbøger; Musikbokse; Klaverer og keyboards; Strengeinstrumenter; Blæseinstrumenter; Xylofoner
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Đồ chơi âm nhạc: Bộ đồ chơi phòng thu DJ; Trống & Nhạc cụ gõ; Thảm âm nhạc tương tác; Bộ đồ chơi Karaoke; Micrô; Sách âm nhạc; Hộp nhạc; Đàn piano & đàn keyboard; Nhạc cụ bộ dây; Nhạc cụ hơi; Mộc cầm
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Musikkleker: DJ-studiosett; Trommer og perkusjonsinstrumenter; Interaktive musikkmatter; Karaokesett; Mikrofoner; Musikalske bøker; Spilledåser; Pianoer og keyboards; Strengeinstrumenter; Vindinstrumenter; Xylofoner
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > 音楽玩具: DJスタジオセット; ドラム・打楽器; インタラクティブなミュージカルマット; カラオケセット; マイク; ミュージカルブック; オルゴール; ピアノ・キーボード; 弦楽器; 管楽器; 木琴
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Glasbene igrače: Kompleti DJ studiev; Bobni in tolkala; Interaktivne glasbene podloge; Kompleti za karaoke; Mikrofoni; Glasbene knjige; Glasbene skrinjice; Klavirji in klaviature; Godala; Pihala; Ksilofoni
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Jucării muzicale: Seturi DJ; Tobe și instrumente de percuție; Covoare muzicale interactive; Seturi de karaoke; Microfoane; Cărți muzicale; Cutii muzicale; Piane și claviaturi; Instrumente cu coarde; Instrumente de suflat; Xilofoane
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Glazbene igračke: DJ studijski setovi; Bubnjevi i udaraljke; Interaktivne glazbene prostirke; Setovi za karaoke; Mikrofoni; Glazbene knjige; Glazbene kutije; Klaviri i klavijature; Gudački instrumenti; Puhački instrumenti; Ksilofoni